Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.050

Prosecuting attorney need not file undertaking prior to order—Nonliability.

In any action brought as herein provided, the prosecuting attorney shall not be required to file any undertaking before the issuance of an injunction order provided for in RCW 7.42.040, shall not be liable for costs and shall not be liable for damages sustained by reason of the injunction order in cases where judgment is rendered in favor of the person, firm, or corporation sought to be enjoined.

[ 1959 c 105 s 5.]